Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE H. PROFESSIONS RELATED TO CERTAIN TYPES OF THERAPY

CHAPTER 451. ATHLETIC TRAINERS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 451.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Athletic injury" means an injury sustained by a person as a result of physical activity or exercise or the person's participation in an organized sport or sport-related exercise or activity, including interscholastic, intercollegiate, intramural, recreational, semiprofessional, and professional sports activities.

(2) "Athletic trainer" means a person who practices athletic training, is licensed by the department, and may use the initials "LAT," "LATC," and "AT" to designate the person as an athletic trainer. The terms "sports trainer" and "licensed athletic trainer" are equivalent to "athletic trainer."

(3) "Athletic training" means the form of health care that includes principles and methods for managing and treating athletic injuries for athletic individuals in good general health under the direction of a physician licensed in this state or another qualified, licensed health professional who is authorized to refer for health care services within the scope of the person's license, and consists of:

(A) managing the risk of an athletic injury or illness;

(B) preventing an athletic injury or illness;

(C) assessing an athletic injury or illness;

(D) providing immediate emergency care;

(E) providing therapeutic intervention for an athletic injury; and

(F) reconditioning an athletic injury or illness.

(4) "Board" means the Advisory Board of Athletic Trainers.

(5) "Commission" means the Texas Commission of Licensing and Regulation.

(6) "Department" means the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation.

(7) "Executive director" means the executive director of the department.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.201(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.072, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.146, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 835 (H.B. 2512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 451.002. INTERPRETATION; PRACTICE OF MEDICINE. This chapter does not authorize the practice of medicine by a person not licensed by the Texas Medical Board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.073, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 451.003. APPLICABILITY. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a physician licensed by the Texas Medical Board or engaged in the practice of medicine as authorized by Section 151.0521;

(2) a dentist, licensed under the laws of this state, engaged in the practice of dentistry;

(3) a licensed optometrist or therapeutic optometrist engaged in the practice of optometry or therapeutic optometry as defined by statute;

(4) an occupational therapist engaged in the practice of occupational therapy;

(5) a nurse engaged in the practice of nursing;

(6) a licensed podiatrist engaged in the practice of podiatry as defined by statute;

(7) a physical therapist engaged in the practice of physical therapy;

(8) a registered massage therapist engaged in the practice of massage therapy;

(9) a commissioned or contract physician, physical therapist, or physical therapist assistant in the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, or Public Health Service; or

(10) an athletic trainer who does not live in this state, who is licensed, registered, or certified by an authority recognized by the department, and who provides athletic training in this state for a period determined by the department.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.201(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.074, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.147, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 376 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. ADVISORY BOARD OF ATHLETIC TRAINERS

Sec. 451.051. BOARD; MEMBERSHIP. (a) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(120), eff. September 1, 2015.

(b) The board consists of five members appointed by the presiding officer of the commission with the approval of the commission as follows:

(1) three members who are athletic trainers; and

(2) two members who represent the public.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 5.002(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

(d) Appointments to the board shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.202(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 4.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.148, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.222(120), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 5.002(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 451.0521. DUTIES OF BOARD. The board shall provide advice and recommendations to the department on technical matters relevant to the administration of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.149, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 451.053. TERMS; VACANCY. (a) Board members serve staggered six-year terms with the terms of one or two members expiring on January 31 of each odd-numbered year.

(b) If a vacancy occurs on the board, the presiding officer of the commission, with the commission's approval, shall appoint a replacement who meets the qualifications for the vacant position to serve for the unexpired portion of the term.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 4.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.150, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 451.055. PRESIDING OFFICER. The presiding officer of the commission shall designate a member of the board to serve as the presiding officer of the board for a one-year term. The presiding officer of the board may vote on any matter before the board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.203(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 285, Sec. 31(36), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.151, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 451.056. MEETINGS. The board shall meet at the call of the presiding officer of the commission or the executive director.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.152, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 451.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The executive director shall administer and enforce this chapter.

(a-1) The department shall:

(1) prescribe the application form for a license applicant;

(2) prescribe a suitable form for a license certificate;

(3) prepare and conduct an examination for license applicants; and

(4) maintain a complete record of all licensed athletic trainers.

(a-2) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 5.002(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(127), eff. September 1, 2015.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(127), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.204(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.154, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.222(127), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 5.002(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 724 (H.B. 2495), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER D. LICENSE REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 451.151. LICENSE REQUIRED. A person may not hold the person out as an athletic trainer or perform any activity of an athletic trainer unless the person holds a license under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 451.152. LICENSE APPLICATION. An applicant for an athletic trainer license must submit to the department:

(1) an application in the manner and on a form prescribed by the executive director; and

(2) the required examination fee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.157, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 451.153. APPLICANT QUALIFICATIONS. (a) An applicant for an athletic trainer license must:

(1) have met the athletic training curriculum requirements of a college or university approved by the commission and give proof of graduation; or

(2) hold a degree or certificate in physical therapy and have completed:

(A) a basic athletic training course from an accredited college or university; and

(B) an apprenticeship described by Subsection (b).

(b) The apprenticeship required to be completed by an applicant consists of 720 hours completed in two years under the direct supervision of a licensed athletic trainer acceptable to the department.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.158, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 724 (H.B. 2495), Sec. 3, eff. June 12, 2023.

Sec. 451.156. REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSE ISSUANCE. An applicant for an athletic trainer license is entitled to receive the license if the applicant:

(1) satisfies the requirements of Section 451.153;

(2) passes the examination required by the department; and

(3) pays the required license fee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.159, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 5.001, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 724 (H.B. 2495), Sec. 4, eff. June 12, 2023.

Sec. 451.157. TEMPORARY LICENSE. (a) The department may issue a temporary license to an applicant if the applicant satisfies:

(1) the requirements of Section 451.153; and

(2) any other requirement established by the commission.

(b) The commission by rule shall prescribe the time during which a temporary license is valid.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.160, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 724 (H.B. 2495), Sec. 5, eff. June 12, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER E. LICENSE RENEWAL

Sec. 451.201. LICENSE EXPIRATION; RENEWAL. (a) A license issued under Section 451.156 expires on the second anniversary of the date of issuance and may be renewed biennially.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(140), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.076, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.161, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.162, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.222(140), eff. September 1, 2015.